Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 8. Penalties, Enforcement and Judicial Review.

§ 10.1-1455.
Penalties and enforcement.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, any condition of a permit or certification, or any regulation or order of the Board shall, upon such finding by an appropriate circuit court, be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $32,500 for each day of such violation. All civil penalties under this section shall be recovered in a civil action brought by the Attorney General in the name of the Commonwealth. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 (§

10.1-2500

et seq.) of this title.

In addition to the penalties provided above, any person who knowingly transports any hazardous waste to an unpermitted facility; who knowingly transports, treats, stores, or disposes of hazardous waste without a permit or in violation of a permit; or who knowingly makes any false statement or representation in any application, disclosure statement, label, manifest, record, report, permit, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of hazardous waste program compliance shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than one year nor more than five years and a fine of not more than $32,500 for each violation, either or both. The provisions of this subsection shall be deemed to constitute a lesser included offense of the violation set forth under subsection I.Each day of violation of each requirement shall constitute a separate offense.

The Board is authorized to issue orders to require any person to comply with the provisions of any law administered by the Board, the Director or the Department, any condition of a permit or certification, or any regulations promulgated by the Board or to comply with any case decision, as defined in § 2.2-4001, of the Board or Director. Any such order shall be issued only after a hearing in accordance with § 2.2-4020 with at least 30 days’ notice to the affected person of the time, place and purpose thereof. Such order shall become effective not less than 15 days after mailing a copy thereof by certified mail to the last known address of such person. The provisions of this section shall not affect the authority of the Board to issue separate orders and regulations to meet any emergency as provided in §

10.1-1402

.

Any person willfully violating or refusing, failing or neglecting to comply with any regulation or order of the Board or the Director, any condition of a permit or certification or any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor unless a different penalty is specified.Any person violating or failing, neglecting, or refusing to obey any lawful regulation or order of the Board or the Director, any condition of a permit or certification or any provision of this chapter may be compelled in a proceeding instituted in an appropriate court by the Board or the Director to obey such regulation, permit, certification, order or provision of this chapter and to comply therewith by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate remedy.

Without limiting the remedies which may be obtained in this section, any person violating or failing, neglecting or refusing to obey any injunction, mandamus or other remedy obtained pursuant to this section shall be subject, in the discretion of the court, to a civil penalty not to exceed $32,500 for each violation. Such civil penalties shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title. Each day of violation of each requirement shall constitute a separate offense. Such civil penalties may, in the discretion of the court assessing them, be directed to be paid into the treasury of the county, city or town in which the violation occurred, to be used to abate environmental pollution in such manner as the court may, by order, direct, except that where the owner in violation is the county, city or town itself, or its agent, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title.

With the consent of any person who has violated or failed, neglected or refused to obey any regulation or order of the Board or the Director, any condition of a permit or any provision of this chapter, the Board may provide, in an order issued by the Board against such person, for the payment of civil charges for past violations in specific sums, not to exceed the limits specified in this section. Such civil charges shall be instead of any appropriate civil penalty which could be imposed under this section. Such civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund pursuant to Chapter 25 of this title.

In addition to all other available remedies, the Board may issue administrative orders for the violation of (i) any law or regulation administered by the Board; (ii) any condition of a permit or certificate issued pursuant to this chapter; or (iii) any case decision or order of the Board. Issuance of an administrative order shall be a case decision as defined in § 2.2-4001 and shall be issued only after a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the Supreme Court in accordance with § 2.2-4020. Orders issued pursuant to this subsection may include civil penalties of up to $32,500 per violation not to exceed $100,000 per order, and may compel the taking of corrective actions or the cessation of any activity upon which the order is based. The Board may assess penalties under this subsection if (a) the person has been issued at least two written notices of alleged violation by the Department for the same or substantially related violations at the same site, (b) such violations have not been resolved by demonstration that there was no violation, by an order issued by the Board or the Director, or by other means, (c) at least 130 days have passed since the issuance of the first notice of alleged violation, and (d) there is a finding that such violations have occurred after a hearing conducted in accordance with this subsection. The actual amount of any penalty assessed shall be based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty. The Board shall provide the person with the calculation for the proposed penalty prior to any hearing conducted for the issuance of an order that assesses penalties pursuant to this subsection. Penalties shall be paid to the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Virginia Environmental Emergency Response Fund (§

10.1-2500

et seq.). The issuance of a notice of alleged violation by the Department shall not be considered a case decision as defined in § 2.2-4001. Any notice of alleged violation shall include a description of each violation, the specific provision of law violated, and information on the process for obtaining a final decision or fact finding from the Department on whether or not a violation has occurred, and nothing in this section shall preclude an owner from seeking such a determination. Orders issued pursuant to this subsection shall become effective five days after having been delivered to the affected persons or mailed by certified mail to the last known address of such persons. Should the Board find that any person is adversely affecting the public health, safety or welfare, or the environment, the Board shall, after a reasonable attempt to give notice, issue, without a hearing, an emergency administrative order directing the person to cease the activity immediately and undertake any needed corrective action, and shall within 10 days hold a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to the person, to affirm, modify, amend or cancel the emergency administrative order. If the Board finds that a person who has been issued an administrative order or an emergency administrative order is not complying with the order’s terms, the Board may utilize the enforcement and penalty provisions of this article to secure compliance.

In addition to all other available remedies, the Department and generators of recycling residues shall have standing to seek enforcement by injunction of conditions which are specified by applicants in order to receive the priority treatment of their permit applications pursuant to §

10.1-1408.1

.

Any person who knowingly transports, treats, stores, disposes of, or exports any hazardous waste in violation of this chapter or in violation of the regulations promulgated by the Board and who knows at the time that he thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of not less than two years nor more than 15 years and a fine of not more than $250,000, either or both. A defendant that is not an individual shall, upon conviction of violating this section, be subject to a fine not exceeding the greater of $1 million or an amount that is three times the economic benefit realized by the defendant as a result of the offense. The maximum penalty shall be doubled with respect to both fine and imprisonment for any subsequent conviction of the same person.

Criminal prosecutions under this chapter shall be commenced within three years after discovery of the offense, notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute.

The Board shall be entitled to an award of reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs in any action brought by the Board under this section in which it substantially prevails on the merits of the case, unless special circumstances would make an award unjust.

The Board shall develop and provide an opportunity for public comment on guidelines and procedures that contain specific criteria for calculating the appropriate penalty for each violation based upon the severity of the violations, the extent of any potential or actual environmental harm, the compliance history of the facility or person, any economic benefit realized from the noncompliance, and the ability of the person to pay the penalty.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-310; 1988, c. 891; 1990, cc. 12, 781, 912, 919; 1991, c. 718; 1993, c. 23; 1998, c. 837; 1999, c. 876; 2005, cc. 133, 706.

Cross references.

As to punishment for felonies, see §

18.2-10

. As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to the definition of “racketeering activity” and the Virginia Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organization Act, see §

18.2-513

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 23, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides: “The provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.”

Acts 2005, c. 706, cl. 2, provides: “That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop uniform procedures to govern the formal hearings conducted pursuant to this act to ensure they are conducted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, any policies adopted by the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, or the State Air Pollution Control Board and to ensure that the facility owners and operators have access to information on how such hearings will be conducted. In addition, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop and implement an early dispute resolution process to help identify and resolve disagreements regarding what is required to comply with the regulations promulgated by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board and any related guidance. The process shall be available after the issuance of a notice of alleged violation or other notice of deficiency issued by the Department. The early dispute resolution process shall be developed by September 1, 2005, and information on the process shall be provided to the public and to facilities potentially impacted by the provisions of this act.”

The 1993 amendment

added “Criminal” at the beginning of subsection I.

The 1998 amendment,

added subsection G, redesignated former subsections G through J as present subsections H through K, and in present subsection I, in the second sentence, substituted “one million dollars” for “$1,000,000.”

The 1999 amendment

substituted “subsection I” for “subsection H” at the end of subsection B, and rewrote subsection G, which formerly read: “In addition to all other available remedies, the Board may issue special orders, as defined in §

10.1-1182

, for the violation of: (i) any law or regulation administered by the Board; (ii) any condition of a permit or certificate issued pursuant to this chapter; or (iii) any case decision or order of the Board. The Board may issue special orders only after at least two consecutive notices of the same violations have been issued without satisfactory compliance and a fact finding proceeding has been held with reasonable notice to the affected persons of the time, place and purpose thereof. Special orders shall become effective five days after having been delivered to the affected persons or mailed by certified mail to the last known address of such persons. Should the Board find that any person is adversely affecting the public health, safety or welfare, the Board shall, after a reasonable attempt to give notice, declare a state of emergency and may issue, without a hearing, an emergency special order directing the person to cease the activity immediately and shall within ten days hold a hearing, after reasonable notice as to the time and place thereof to the person, to affirm, modify, amend or cancel the emergency special order. If the Board finds that a person who has been issued a special order or an emergency special order is not complying with the special order’s terms, the Board may utilize the enforcement and penalty provisions of this article to secure compliance.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 133 substituted “$32,500” for “$25,000” in subsections A, B, and E; inserted “in accordance with § 2.2-4020” in the second sentence in subsection C and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 706 substituted “$32,500” for “$25,000” in subsections A, B, and E; inserted “in accordance with § 2.2-4020” in the second sentence of subsection C; rewrote subsection G; and added subsection L and made minor stylistic changes.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

No double jeopardy bar. —

Double jeopardy pursuant to Va. Const., art. I, § 8, U.S. Const., amend. V, or
§

19.2-294

did not bar defendant’s felony prosecution for charges stemming from the making and storing of hazardous materials for the purpose of manufacturing fireworks, violations of
§§

18.2-85

and

10.1-1455

, after he pleaded guilty to violations of Norfolk, Va. City Code §§ 17.1-43 and 17.1-44(25), because each of the four statutes required different elements of proof. Commonwealth v. Saunders, 78 Va. Cir. 345, 2009 Va. Cir. LEXIS 173 (Norfolk May 27, 2009).

§ 10.1-1456.
Right of entry to inspect, etc.; warrants.

Upon presentation of appropriate credentials and upon consent of the owner or custodian, the Director or his designee shall have the right to enter at any reasonable time onto any property to inspect, investigate, evaluate, conduct tests or take samples for testing as he reasonably deems necessary in order to determine whether the provisions of any law administered by the Board, Director or Department, any regulations of the Board, any order of the Board or Director or any conditions in a permit, license or certificate issued by the Board or Director are being complied with. If the Director or his designee is denied entry, he may apply to an appropriate circuit court for an inspection warrant authorizing such investigation, evaluation, inspection, testing or taking of samples for testing as provided in Chapter 24 (§

19.2-393

et seq.) of Title 19.2.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-311; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1457.
Judicial review.

Except as provided in subsection B, any person aggrieved by a final decision of the Board or Director under this chapter shall be entitled to judicial review thereof in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.).

Any person who has participated, in person or by the submittal of written comments, in the public comment process related to a final decision of the Board or Director under §

10.1-1408.1

or §

10.1-1426

and who has exhausted all available administrative remedies for review of the Board’s or Director’s decision, shall be entitled to judicial review thereof in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§ 2.2-4000 et seq.) if such person meets the standard for obtaining judicial review of a case or controversy pursuant to Article III of the United States Constitution. A person shall be deemed to meet such standard if (i) such person has suffered an actual or imminent injury which is an invasion of a legally protected interest and which is concrete and particularized; (ii) such injury is fairly traceable to the decision of the Board and not the result of the independent action of some third party not before the court; and (iii) such injury will likely be redressed by a favorable decision by the court.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-312; 1988, c. 891; 1996, c. 1032.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, c. 1032, cl. 4 provides: “[t]hat the second enactment of this act shall not be effective unless and until a final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction has declared that subsection B of §

10.1-1318

as it is currently effective does not meet the requirements for state program approval under Title V of the federal Clean Air Act or regulations promulgated thereunder with respect to standing to seek judicial review of state permitting decisions.”

Acts 1996, c. 1032, cl. 5, as added by Acts 1997, c. 520, cl. 1, provides: “That the ‘final and unappealable decision of a court of competent jurisdiction’ referred to in enactment clauses 3 and 4 was rendered by the United States Supreme Court in the case of Commonwealth vs. Browner on January 21, 1997.”

The 1996 amendment

added the subsection A designation, inserted “Except as provided in subsection B” at the beginning of subsection A and added subsection B. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 10.1-1458.
Persons to provide plans, specifications, and information.

Every person the Department has reason to believe is generating, storing, transporting, disposing of, or treating waste shall, on request of the Department, furnish such plans, specifications, and information as the Department may require in the discharge of its duties under this chapter. Trade secret information included within any plans, specifications, or information submitted pursuant to this section shall be excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act as provided in subdivision 26 of § 2.2-3705.6. At all times, the Department may disclose such trade secret information to the appropriate officials of the Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the requirements of the federal Solid Waste Disposal Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., or as otherwise required by law.

History.

2013, c. 54.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “42 U.S.C. § 6901” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 3251” in this section.